Washington statutes.
RCW 36.71.060

Peddler's license—Penalty for peddling without license.

Every peddler who sells or offers for sale or exposes for sale, at public or private sale any goods, wares, or merchandise without a county license, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than ninety days or by fine of not less than fifty dollars nor more than two hundred dollars or by both.

[ 2003 c 53 s 207; 1963 c 4 s 36.71.060. Prior: 1909 c 214 s 2; RRS s 8354.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.